Utah statutes.
53A-6-210.   Construction of compact.
This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes of
it.  The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase,
clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to
the constitution of any state or of the United States, or the application
thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid,
the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to
any government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
If this compact is held contrary to the constitution of any state
participating therein, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to
the state affected as to all severable matters.
